test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NAD_C_mishoomis_gt-norm.yaml
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimishoomisensishinaanidig, gimishoomisensishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisensishiwaabaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisensishiwaabaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisensishiwaabaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimishoomisensishiwaadig, gimishoomisensishiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimishoomisensishiwaadig, gimishoomisensishiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimishoomisensishiwaadig, gimishoomisensishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omishoomisenyishiniibaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omishoomisenyishiniibaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omishoomisenyishiniibaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisenyishiniidig, omishoomisenyishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisenyishiniidig, omishoomisenyishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisenyishiniidig, omishoomisenyishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omishoomisenyishiwaabaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omishoomisenyishiwaabaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omishoomisenyishiwaabaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisenyishiwaadig, omishoomisenyishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisenyishiwaadig, omishoomisenyishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisenyishiwaadig, omishoomisenyishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omishoomisensishiniibaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omishoomisensishiniibaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omishoomisensishiniibaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisensishiniidig, omishoomisensishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisensishiniidig, omishoomisensishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisensishiniidig, omishoomisensishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omishoomisensishiwaabaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omishoomisensishiwaabaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omishoomisensishiwaabaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisensishiwaadig, omishoomisensishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisensishiwaadig, omishoomisensishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisensishiwaadig, omishoomisensishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nimishoomisimishinaanibaniing
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nimishoomisimishinaanibaniin
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nimishoomisimishinaanibaniig
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nimishoomisimishinaanidig, nimishoomisimishinaanidog]
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nimishoomisimishinaanidig, nimishoomisimishinaanidog]
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nimishoomisimishinaanidig, nimishoomisimishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisimishinaanibaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisimishinaanibaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisimishinaanibaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gimishoomisimishinaanidig, gimishoomisimishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gimishoomisimishinaanidig, gimishoomisimishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimishoomisimishinaanidig, gimishoomisimishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisimishiwaabaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisimishiwaabaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisimishiwaabaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimishoomisimishiwaadig, gimishoomisimishiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimishoomisimishiwaadig, gimishoomisimishiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimishoomisimishiwaadig, gimishoomisimishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omishoomisimishiniibaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omishoomisimishiniibaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omishoomisimishiniibaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisimishiniidig, omishoomisimishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisimishiniidig, omishoomisimishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisimishiniidig, omishoomisimishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omishoomisimishiwaabaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omishoomisimishiwaabaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omishoomisimishiwaabaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisimishiwaadig, omishoomisimishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisimishiwaadig, omishoomisimishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisimishiwaadig, omishoomisimishiwaadog]
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nimishoomisenyimishinaanibaniing
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nimishoomisenyimishinaanibaniin
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nimishoomisenyimishinaanibaniig
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nimishoomisenyimishinaanidig, nimishoomisenyimishinaanidog]
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nimishoomisenyimishinaanidig, nimishoomisenyimishinaanidog]
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nimishoomisenyimishinaanidig, nimishoomisenyimishinaanidog]
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nimishoomisensimishinaanibaniing
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nimishoomisensimishinaanibaniin
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nimishoomisensimishinaanibaniig
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nimishoomisensimishinaanidig, nimishoomisensimishinaanidog]
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nimishoomisensimishinaanidig, nimishoomisensimishinaanidog]
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nimishoomisensimishinaanidig, nimishoomisensimishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisenyimishinaanibaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisenyimishinaanibaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisenyimishinaanibaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gimishoomisenyimishinaanidig, gimishoomisenyimishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gimishoomisenyimishinaanidig, gimishoomisenyimishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimishoomisenyimishinaanidig, gimishoomisenyimishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisenyimishiwaabaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisenyimishiwaabaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisenyimishiwaabaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimishoomisenyimishiwaadig, gimishoomisenyimishiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimishoomisenyimishiwaadig, gimishoomisenyimishiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimishoomisenyimishiwaadig, gimishoomisenyimishiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisensimishinaanibaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisensimishinaanibaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisensimishinaanibaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gimishoomisensimishinaanidig, gimishoomisensimishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gimishoomisensimishinaanidig, gimishoomisensimishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimishoomisensimishinaanidig, gimishoomisensimishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisensimishiwaabaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisensimishiwaabaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisensimishiwaabaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimishoomisensimishiwaadig, gimishoomisensimishiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimishoomisensimishiwaadig, gimishoomisensimishiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimishoomisensimishiwaadig, gimishoomisensimishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omishoomisenyimishiniibaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omishoomisenyimishiniibaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omishoomisenyimishiniibaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisenyimishiniidig, omishoomisenyimishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisenyimishiniidig, omishoomisenyimishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisenyimishiniidig, omishoomisenyimishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omishoomisenyimishiwaabaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omishoomisenyimishiwaabaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omishoomisenyimishiwaabaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisenyimishiwaadig, omishoomisenyimishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisenyimishiwaadig, omishoomisenyimishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisenyimishiwaadig, omishoomisenyimishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omishoomisensimishiniibaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omishoomisensimishiniibaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omishoomisensimishiniibaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisensimishiniidig, omishoomisensimishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisensimishiniidig, omishoomisensimishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisensimishiniidig, omishoomisensimishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omishoomisensimishiwaabaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omishoomisensimishiwaabaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omishoomisensimishiwaabaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisensimishiwaadig, omishoomisensimishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisensimishiwaadig, omishoomisensimishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisensimishiwaadig, omishoomisensimishiwaadog]
     
